Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3212.01
Merger and transfer of existing districts or boards; effect.

Mergers and transfers of existing districts or boards into natural resources districts pursuant to sections 2-3207 to 2-3212 shall not be construed as being discontinuances or dissolutions of those districts or boards as may be provided for by statute outside such sections.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 59, p. 134;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 2-3259;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 1.